Hawaii, session 2026, HB1210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to inform members of the public school system on bullying by requiring: (1)  The department of education to provide and disseminate information on its bullying procedures; and (2)  Principals, teachers, and staff to disseminate this information to students. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A‑ Bullying; information.  (a) The department shall provide students, parents, principals, teachers, staff,  and the general public with its bullying procedures. (b)  Principals, teachers, and staff shall disseminate the department's bullying procedures to students in various forms, including posting the information in a prominent place at school and at school functions. (c) For the purposes of this section, "bullying procedures" means procedures to: (1)  Identify, report, and respond to bullying; and (2)  Provide comfort and safety to a person who is a victim of bullying. "Bullying procedures" does not include training to medically treat a person suffering from a mental health condition as a result of being bullied." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________